Utah statutes.
55-12-105.   Article 5 -- Organization and operation of the Interstate
Commission.
(1)  Section A.  By-laws
The Interstate Commission shall, by a majority of the members present and
voting, within 12 months after the first commission meeting, adopt by-laws to
govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the
purposes of the compact, including, but not limited to:
(a)  establishing the fiscal year of the commission;
(b)  establishing an executive committee and any other committees as
necessary;
(c)  providing for the establishment of committees governing any general or
specific delegation of any authority or function of the commission;
(d)  providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of
the commission, and ensuring reasonable notice of each meeting;
(e)  establishing the titles and responsibilities of the officers of the
commission;
(f)  providing a mechanism for concluding the operations of the commission and
the return of any surplus funds that may exist upon the termination of the
compact after the payment and reserving of all of its debts and obligations;
(g)  providing "start-up" rules for initial administration of the compact; and
(h)  establishing standards and procedures for compliance and technical
assistance in carrying out the compact.
(2)  Section B.  Officers and Staff
(a)  The Interstate Commission shall, by a majority of the members, elect
annually from among its members a chairperson and a vice chairperson, each of
whom shall have the authority and duties specified in the by-laws.  The
chairperson or, in the chairperson's absence or disability, the vice
chairperson shall preside at all meetings of the commission.
(b)  The officers shall serve without compensation or remuneration from the
commission, provided that, subject to the availability of budgeted funds, the
officers shall be reimbursed for any ordinary and necessary costs and expenses
incurred by them in the performance of their duties and responsibilities as
officers of the commission.
(c)  The commission shall, through its executive committee, appoint or retain
an executive director for any time period, upon any terms and conditions, and
for any compensation as the commission may consider appropriate.  The
executive director shall serve as secretary to the commission, but may not be
a member and shall hire and supervise other staff as authorized by the
commission.
(3)  Section C.  Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
(a)  The Interstate Commission's executive director and employees shall be
immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official
capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury
or other civil liability caused or arising out of or relating to any actual or
alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided, that a person may not be
protected from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability
caused by the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of the person.
(b)  The liability of any commissioner, or the employee or agent of a
commissioner, acting within the scope of the person's employment or duties for
acts, errors, or omissions occurring within the person's state may not exceed
the limits of liability set forth under the constitution and laws of that
state for state officials, employees, and agents.  Nothing in this Subsection
(3) shall be construed to protect any person from suit or liability for any
damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful and
wanton misconduct of the person.
(c)  The commission shall defend the executive director or the employees or
representatives of the commission and, subject to the approval of the attorney
general of the state represented by any commissioner of a compacting state,
shall defend the commissioner or the commissioner's representatives or
employees in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any
actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of
commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the defendant had
a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged
act, error, or omission did not result from intentional or willful and wanton
misconduct on the part of the person.
(d)  The commission shall indemnify and hold the commissioner of a compacting
state,  the commissioner's representatives or employees, or the commission's
representatives or employees harmless in the amount of any settlement or
judgment obtained against the persons arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the persons had a reasonable
basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment,
duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error,
or omission did not result from intentional or willful and wanton misconduct
on the part of the persons.
